District of Columbia statutes.
2-354.20

Prequalification.

(a)

The CPO may establish a prequalification process to certify the financial and professional qualifications of prospective bidders and offerors for District government contracts. The CPO may limit participation in certain procurements to prospective contractors who have been prequalified under the process.

(b)

The use of the prequalification process under this section shall not nullify the requirement for a determination of contractor responsibility under subchapter III of this chapter.

(c)

Information about a prospective or current contractor relevant to a contractor’s prequalification criteria may be submitted by a member of the general public to the CPO for consideration in determining or verifying the contractor’s prequalified status.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 420, 58 DCR 1185